Maine, session 132, LD1662.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4364-A, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 192, §6, is
further amended to read:
1. Use allowed. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, except as
provided in Title 12, chapter 423‑A, for any area in which residential uses are allowed,
including as a conditional use, a municipality shall allow structures with up to 2 dwelling
units per lot if that lot does not contain an existing dwelling unit, except that a municipality
with a population of more than 10,000 shall allow up to 4 dwelling units per lot if that lot
does not contain an existing dwelling unit and the lot is located in a designated growth area
within a municipality consistent with section 4349‑A, subsection 1, paragraph A or B or if
the lot is served by a public, special district or other centrally managed water system and a
public, special district or other comparable sewer system in a municipality without a
comprehensive plan.
A municipality shall allow on a lot with one existing dwelling unit the addition of up to 2
dwelling units: one additional dwelling unit within or attached to an existing structure or
one additional detached dwelling unit, or one of each.
A municipality may allow more units than the number required to be allowed by this
subsection.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §4364-A, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 192, §8, is
further amended to read:
2. Zoning requirements. With respect to dwelling units allowed under this section,
municipal zoning ordinances in a municipality with a population of more than 10,000 must
comply with the following conditions.
A. If more than one dwelling unit has been constructed on a lot as a result of the
allowance under this section or section 4364‑B, the lot is not eligible for any additional
increases in density except as allowed by the municipality.
B. A municipal zoning ordinance may establish a prohibition or an allowance for lots
where a dwelling unit in existence after the implementation date is torn down and an
empty lot results.
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §4364-B, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 192, §12, is
further amended to read:
1. Use permitted. Except as provided in Title 12, chapter 423‑A, a municipality with
a population of more than 10,000 shall allow an accessory dwelling unit to be located on
the same lot as a single-family dwelling unit in any area in which residential uses are
permitted, including as a conditional use.
Sec. 4. 30-A MRSA §4364-B, sub-§1-C is enacted to read:
1-C. Applicability. The requirements of this section apply only to a municipality with
a population of more than 10,000.
Page 1 - 132LR0790(01)